Alabama, session 2026rs, HB454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 15-5-12, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§15-5-12
(a) A search warrant must be executed and returned to
Page 1

(a) A search warrant must be executed and returned to
HB454 INTRODUCED
the judge or the magistrate by whom it was issued within as
follows:
(1) Within 10 days after its date; or
(2) Within 60 days after its date for the collection of
a DNA reference sample for confirmatory forensic analysis,
pursuant to an investigative lead generated from a search of
the Combined DNA Index System (CODIS); if not executed after
such time, it.
(b) A search warrant not executed and returned in
accordance with this section is void."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2